Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 2. Reports

§ 16.20.
Financial statements for members.

A corporation upon written demand from a member shall furnish that member its latest annual financial statements, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries or affiliates, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and statement of operations for the year. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements must also be prepared on that basis.

If annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant’s report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by the statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s financial accounting records:

stating the president’s or other person’s reasonable belief as to whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 16.21.
Report of indemnification to members.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under section 8.51, 8.52, 8.53, or 8.54 of this title in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the members with or before the notice of the next meeting of members.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 16.22.
Biennial report for Secretary of State.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State, shall deliver to the Secretary of State a biennial report on a form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State that sets forth:

the name of the corporation and the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

the address of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at the office in this State;

the address of its principal office;

the names and business or residence addresses of its directors and principal officers; and

a brief description of the nature of its activities.

The information in the biennial report must be current on the date the biennial report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

The first biennial report must be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a domestic corporation was incorporated or a foreign corporation was authorized to transact business. Subsequent biennial reports must be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and April 1 following each succeeding two calendar years.

If a biennial report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and delivered to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.